Illinois, session 104th, SB1953.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5adding Section 6.5 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/6.5 new)7    Sec. 6.5. Hiring decisions; inspection of employment 8records.9    (a) No law enforcement agency shall make a final offer of 10employment for the position of probationary police officer, 11probationary part-time police officer, full-time law 12enforcement officer, or part-time law enforcement officer 13without requiring the execution of a signed release from the 14applicant, presented in accordance with this Section, 15directing any and all entities that previously employed the 16individual to produce or make available for inspection all 17employment records, including background investigation 18materials collected in connection with making a final offer of 19employment; duty-related physical and psychological 20fitness-for-duty examinations; work performance records; 21records of criminal, civil, or administrative investigations 22of conduct; arrests; convictions; findings of guilt; pleas of 23guilty; or pleas of nolo contendere.  SB1953 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1    (b) Any law enforcement agency or other previous employer 2that receives a signed request for the employment records of 3any current or former employee, as described in subsection 4(a), shall produce those records to the requesting law 5enforcement agency within 14 days after receipt of that 6request. If additional time is required for production of the 7requested records, the producing law enforcement agency or 8other previous employer may advise the requesting law 9enforcement agency that an extension of up to 14 days is 10required. The producing law enforcement agency shall also 11execute and provide a signed verification that indicates all 12responsive records have been provided and that no known 13records have been intentionally withheld. The producing law 14enforcement agency or other previous employer shall also 15certify in writing that it is not aware of any other credible, 16verifiable, relevant, and material information regarding the 17applicant that would reflect negatively on the applicant's 18fitness for employment as an officer and that is not contained 19in the records produced.20    (c) The requesting law enforcement agency or the Board may 21be required to pay the reasonable costs and expenses of the 22agency that is collecting and producing responsive records.23    (d) With the exception of social security numbers, 24individual taxpayer identification numbers, driver's license 25and state identification card numbers, financial account 26numbers, and debit and credit card numbers, all records   SB1953 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1referenced in paragraph (1) shall be produced without any 2redaction, and no nondisclosure, separation, or settlement 3agreement shall prevent the production of these records. If 4some records have been sealed or otherwise protected by a 5court order, then the requesting agency shall be advised in 6writing so it can seek appropriate relief from the court that 7entered the sealing or nondisclosure order.8    (e) If an entity required to produce records in accordance 9with this Section fails to produce the requested records, the 10requesting law enforcement agency may seek a court order to 11compel the production of those records. In addition to 12granting equitable relief, the circuit court may also award 13the requesting agency fees and costs, including reasonable 14attorney's fees incurred in seeking a court order.15    (f) The requesting law enforcement agency shall receive 16and review all materials before making a final offer of 17employment.18    (g) The requirements of this Section are in addition to 19and not in lieu of the other investigations required under the 20Act.21    (h) The provisions of this Section do not apply to the 22extent that they are inconsistent with provisions otherwise 23agreed to in collective bargaining agreements in effect on the 24effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 25Assembly. A collective bargaining agreement that conflicts 26with this Section may not be entered into, modified, or   SB1953 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1extended on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 2of the 104th General Assembly. These provisions also do not 3apply if the previous law enforcement employer has been 4provided with a directive and explanation, in writing, from 5the State's Attorney of the county in which the previous law 6enforcement employer is located that the previous law 7enforcement employer is not legally authorized to provide the 8requested information.9    (i) The written release to be signed and executed by an 10applicant, directing any agency that previously employed the 11applicant to produce or make available for inspection all of 12the applicant's employment records, as required by this 13Section, may take the following form: 14CONSENT AND RELEASE FOR BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION 15    Acknowledgment of Consent 16    I, [Applicant's Name], acknowledge that I am seeking 17employment in a safety-sensitive field and that establishing 18my employment eligibility requires a thorough investigation 19into my background and character.20    Furthermore, I acknowledge and agree that as a condition 21of being considered for employment with [Prospective 22Employer's Name] ("Employer"), or for maintaining my continued 23employment with the employer, it is required that I consent to 24a complete and thorough investigation of my background to 25determine whether I am a suitable candidate for the position 26of [Name of Job Title] with the employer.  SB1953 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1    Mandatory Background Investigation2    I authorize the employer to conduct a background 3investigation of me, which shall include, but shall not be 4limited to, a:5        (1) a review of my complete employment history;6        (2) a review of my complete criminal history;7        (3) a review of driving records;8        (4) a background check with the Department of Children 9    and Family Services;10        (5) interviews with my personal references;11        (6) a review of all internal investigation files from 12    any previous employers;13        (7) a verification of academic credentials and 14    licenses;15        (8) a review of my military service history, if any; 16    and17        (9) a review of the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 18    Standards Board's records and officer misconduct database.19    Credit Check20    I hereby consent to the employer obtaining and reviewing 21any credit and consumer reports, as permitted under the 22federal Fair Credit Reporting Act and local or state credit 23privacy laws, if applicable. I understand that the Fair Credit 24Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681, et seq., authorizes me to 25request a copy of any consumer credit report from the consumer 26reporting agency that compiled the report.  SB1953 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1    Consent to Release of Information2    I hereby consent to the release of all employment records 3from my current and former employers, including, but not 4limited to:5        (1) job applications;6        (2) personnel files;7        (3) internal investigations;8        (4) separation agreements;9        (5) pre-employment evaluations;10        (6) tests;11        (7) questionnaires;12        (8) fitness-for-duty examinations; and13        (9) any other information obtained about me by the 14    entity to whom this Consent is presented.15    Consent to Required Interviews and Evaluations16    I further agree to participate in a personal interview, 17testing process, polygraph examination, post-offer 18psychological evaluation and medical evaluation, or any 19combination of those examinations or tests, as determined by 20the employer.21    Confidentiality22    All information obtained by the employer under this 23background investigation shall be confidential and safeguarded 24against disclosure to all unauthorized persons as required by 25law. However, nothing prevents the employer from using the 26information obtained to evaluate my suitability for   SB1953 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1employment.2    I specifically consent to the disclosure of information 3that may be covered by a settlement agreement or other 4confidentiality provision entered into with my former 5employers, and I waive any rights to enforce any prior 6confidentiality agreement against my former employer about 7this disclosure.8    Waiver of Privacy9    I waive any right or claim to privacy in such information 10and consent to the disclosure of information that may be 11exempt from disclosure by law.12    I waive any right I may have to be notified by any 13individuals and organizations named in my application for 14employment before the release of any information to the 15employer, including the release of information concerning any 16disciplinary action taken against me by former employers.17    Indemnification18    In exchange for this release of all of my personnel 19information, I, agree to release, discharge, and hold harmless 20any person, firm, or entity and their employees and agents 21that disclose information in response to receipt of this 22consent, from any liability for all claims, liabilities, 23causes of action, known or unknown, fixed or contingent, that 24arise from or that are in any manner connected to the 25disclosure of any personal information as described above. I 26further release and hold harmless the employer and the   SB1953 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1employer's respective personnel, employees, and agents from 2any liability resulting from or in connection with, the 3results of this background investigation concerning my fitness 4for employment or continued employment at the employer or the 5decision to hire me, not to hire me, or retain me in my 6position.7    Signature8    I agree to electronically sign this document and certify 9that I have read, understand, and agree to the terms and 10conditions set forth in this document and that this is a 11complete waiver under Section 10 of Employment Record 12Disclosure Act.13    Signature ...............................................14    Printed Name.............................................15    Social Security No.......................................16    (j) The Board and any local or State agency, sheriff, 17police chief, county, municipality, private business or 18corporation, or other person is immune from suit or liability 19for submitting, disclosing, or releasing information of 20employment records, including background investigation 21materials collected in connection with making a final offer of 22employment; duty-related physical and psychological 23fitness-for-duty examinations; work performance records; 24records of criminal, civil, or administrative investigations 25of conduct; arrests; convictions; findings of guilt; pleas of 26guilty; or pleas of nolo contendere under this Section upon   SB1953 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1receiving a written release for those records executed and 2presented in accordance with this Section, as long as the 3information is submitted, disclosed, or released in good faith 4and without malice. The Board, all previous employers, and the 5agents and employees of all previous employers have immunity 6for the release of the information. 7    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 8Section 3-8002 as follows: 9    (55 ILCS 5/3-8002)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-8002)10    Sec. 3-8002. Applicability and adoption. The county board 11of every county having a county police department merit board 12established under the County Police Department Act (repealed) 13or a merit commission for sheriff's personnel established 14under Section 58.1 of "An Act to revise the law in relation to 15counties", approved March 31, 1874, as amended (repealed), 16shall adopt and implement the merit system provided by this 17Division and shall modify the merit system now in effect in 18that county as may be necessary to comply with this Division.19    The county board of any county having a population of at 20least 75,000 less than 1,000,000 which does not have a merit 21board or merit commission for sheriff's personnel shall may 22adopt and implement by ordinance the merit system provided by 23this Division. For counties with a population of less than 2475,000, if If the county board does not adopt such a merit   SB1953 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1system by an ordinance and if a petition signed by not fewer 2than 5% or 1000, whichever is less, of the registered electors 3of any such county is filed with the county clerk requesting a 4referendum on the adoption of a merit system for deputies in 5the office of the Sheriff, the county board shall, by 6appropriate ordinance, cause the question to be submitted to 7the electors of the county, at a special or general election 8specified in such ordinance, in accordance with the provisions 9of Section 28-3 of the Election Code. Notice of the election 10shall be given as provided in Article 12 of that Code. If a 11majority of those voting on the proposition at such election 12vote in favor thereof, the county board shall adopt and 13implement a merit system provided in this Division. When a 14merit board or merit commission for sheriff's personnel has 15been established in a county, it may be abolished by the same 16procedure in which it was established.17    This Division does not apply to any county having a 18population of more than 1,000,000 nor to any county which has 19not elected to adopt the merit system provided by this 20Division and which is not required to do so under this Section.21(Source: P.A. 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 22    Section 15. The Personnel Record Review Act is amended by 23changing Sections 1 and 8 and by adding Section 8.5 as follows: 24    (820 ILCS 40/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 2001)  SB1953 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    (a) "Employee" means a person currently employed or 3subject to recall after layoff or leave of absence with a right 4to return at a position with an employer or a former employee 5who has terminated service within the preceding year.6    (b) "Employer" means an individual, corporation, 7partnership, labor organization, unincorporated association, 8the State, an agency or a political subdivision of the State, 9or any other legal, business, or commercial entity which has 5 10employees or more than 5 employees exclusive of the employer's 11parent, spouse or child or other members of his immediate 12family and includes an agent of the employer.13    (c) "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with 14statutory police powers and the ability to employ individuals 15authorized to make arrests.16    (d) "Law enforcement personnel file" means all records 17related to a law enforcement officer's performance, 18discipline, training, employment history, and any 19investigation of the law enforcement officer for the duration 20of the law enforcement officer's employment with the law 21enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, background 22investigation materials collected in connection with making a 23final offer of employment, duty-related physical and 24psychological fitness-for-duty examinations, work performance 25records, criminal, civil, or administrative investigations of 26conduct, arrests, convictions, findings of guilt, pleas of   SB1953 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1guilty, or pleas of nolo contendere. 2(Source: P.A. 83-1339.) 3    (820 ILCS 40/8)  (from Ch. 48, par. 2008)4    Sec. 8. An employer shall review a personnel record before 5releasing information to a third party and, except when the 6release is required under Section 8.5 or ordered to a party in 7a legal action or arbitration, delete disciplinary reports, 8letters of reprimand, or other records of disciplinary action 9which are more than 4 years old. This Section does not apply to 10a school district or an authorized employee or agent of a 11school district who is sharing information related to an 12incident or an attempted incident of sexual abuse, severe 13physical abuse, or sexual misconduct as defined in subsection 14(c) of Section 22-85.5 of this Code. 15(Source: P.A. 101-531, eff. 8-23-19; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23.) 16    (820 ILCS 40/8.5 new)17    Sec. 8.5. Release of law enforcement personnel files.18    (a) A law enforcement agency shall release a complete law 19enforcement personnel file upon receipt of a written request 20from a law enforcement agency for the purpose of making an 21employment determination by the law enforcement agency or a 22hiring board, such as the Illinois State Police Merit Board or 23an equivalent board. A written request made under this 24subsection shall be on the law enforcement agency's official   SB1953 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1letterhead, signed by the agency head or the agency head's 2designee, and shall include a written release or waiver for 3the personnel file and records signed by the law enforcement 4applicant applying for employment with the law enforcement 5agency.6    Except for a social security number, individual taxpayer 7identification number, driver's license and state 8identification card number, financial account number, and 9debit and credit card number, the law enforcement applicant's 10personnel file shall be produced without any redaction. Any 11provision in a nondisclosure, separation, or settlement 12agreement that prohibits the production of a law enforcement 13personnel file is null and void. If a record has been sealed or 14otherwise protected by a court order, the producing law 15enforcement agency shall notify the requesting law enforcement 16agency and the requesting law enforcement agency may seek 17appropriate relief from the court that entered the sealing or 18nondisclosure order.19    (b) If a request is made for release of a law enforcement 20personnel file that satisfies the requirements described in 21subsection (a), the producing law enforcement agency shall 22release a copy of the law enforcement personnel file to the 23requesting law enforcement agency no later than 14 days after 24receipt of the request. If additional time is required for 25production of the law enforcement personnel file, the 26producing law enforcement agency may inform the requesting law   SB1953 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 12056 RTM 22151 b1enforcement agency that an extension of up to 14 days is 2required.3    Upon producing a law enforcement personnel file, the 4producing law enforcement agency shall execute and provide a 5signed verification form that indicates all responsive records 6have been provided and that no known records have been 7intentionally withheld. The producing law enforcement agency 8shall also certify in writing that it is not aware of any other 9credible, verifiable, relevant, and material information 10regarding the applicant that would reflect negatively on the 11applicant's fitness for employment as an officer and that is 12not contained in the law enforcement personnel file.13    (c) The provisions of this Section do not apply to the 14extent that they are inconsistent with provisions otherwise 15agreed to in collective bargaining agreements in effect on the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17Assembly. A collective bargaining agreement that conflicts 18with this Section may not be entered into, modified, or 19extended on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 20of the 104th General Assembly. 21    (d) A law enforcement agency and a law enforcement 22agency's agents and employees are immune from suit and 23liability for producing, disclosing, or releasing a law 24enforcement applicant's personnel file in accordance with this 25Section.